Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5046.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-64-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-64 entitled "Electronic
Imaging Devices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-64-3. Unauthorized dissemination of indecent material.
(a) A person is guilty of unauthorized dissemination of a sexually explicit visual image of
another person when the person intentionally, by any means, disseminates, publishes, or sells:
(1) A visual image that depicts another identifiable person eighteen (18) years or older
engaged in sexually explicit conduct or of the intimate areas of that person including any image
created by a digital device or altered by digitization;
(2) The visual image was made, captured, recorded, or obtained under circumstances in
which a reasonable person would know or understand that the image was to remain private or
created without the consent of the person;
(3) The visual image was disseminated, published, or sold without the consent of the
depicted person; and
(4) With knowledge or with reckless disregard for the likelihood that the depicted person
will suffer harm, or with the intent to harass, intimidate, threaten, or coerce the depicted person.
(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to:
(1) A visual image that involves voluntary exposure of intimate areas or of sexually explicit
conduct in a public or commercial setting, or in a place where a person does not have a reasonable
expectation of privacy;

(2) Dissemination made in the public interest, scientific activities, or educational activities;
(3) Dissemination made in the course of a lawful public proceeding;
(4) Dissemination made for purposes of law enforcement, criminal reporting, corrections,
legal proceedings, the reporting of unlawful conduct, or for medical treatment; or
(5) Dissemination of an image that constitutes a matter of public concern, such as a matter
related to a newsworthy event or related to a public figure.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “intimate areas” means the naked genitals, pubic area,
buttocks, or any portion of the female breast below the top of the areola of a person that the person
intended to protect from public view.
(d) A first violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, subject to
imprisonment of not more than one year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or
both. A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be a felony and, upon conviction,
subject to imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand
dollars ($3,000), or both.
(e) Any person who intentionally threatens to disclose any visual image described in
subsection (a) and makes the threat to obtain a benefit in return for not making the disclosure or in
connection with the threatened disclosure, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be
subject to imprisonment for up to five (5) years, a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or
both.
(f) Any person who demands payment of money, property, services, or anything else of
value from a person in exchange for removing any visual image described in subsection (a) from
public view shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment for up to
five (5) years, a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(g) Those in violation of this section shall not be subject to sex offender registration
requirements as set forth in chapter 37.1 of title 11 entitled “Sexual Offender Registration and
Community Notification Act.”
(h) A violation of this section is committed within this state if any conduct that is an
element of the offense, or any harm to the depicted person resulting from the offense, occurs in this
state.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on an interactive computer
service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2), an information service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153,
or a telecommunications service, as defined in § 44-18-7.1, for content provided by another person.
LC000053 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000053
========
LC000053 - Page 3 of 4